South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S452.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 1.B. of Act 80 of 2013, as last amended by Act 138 of 2020, is amended further to read: B. The provisions of Chapter 44, Title 11, contained in this act, are repealed on December 31, 20252035. Any carry forward credits shall continue to be allowed until the ten-year time period in Section 11-44-40(B) is completed. SECTION 2.  Section 11-44-10 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 11-44-10.  This chapter may be cited as the "High Growth Small Business Job Creation Act of 2013 - Angel Investor Tax Credit Act." SECTION 3.  Chapter 44, Title 11 is retitled the "High Growth Small Business Job Creation Act - Angel Investor Tax Credit Act." SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----